languages/apertium-kaa/apertium-kaa.kaa.twol
Alphabet

 A B V G D E J Z İ Y K Q L M N O P R S T U W F X H I
 a b v g d e j z i y k q l m n o p r s t u w f x h ı

 %{A%}:a ! %{A%}:e
 %{I%}:ı ! %{I%}:i 
! %{G%}:g %{G%}:k %{G%}:q
 %{G%}:g
 %{N%}:n
 %{E%}:a
 %{K%}:q ! %{K%}:k
 %{D%}:d ! %{D%}:t
 %{M%}:m ! %{M%}:b %{M%}:p

! %{'%}:0 %{'%}:%'
! %{'%}:0
 %{s%}:s ! %{s%}:0
 %{n%}:n ! %{n%}:0
 %{y%}:0 ! %{y%}:i %{y%}:0
 %{l%}:l
! %{%_%}:0  ! sometimes surfaces as '

 %{❗%}:0
 %{☭%}:0
 %{ъ%}:0
 %{ь%}:0
 %{ꙑ%}:0

 %{а%}:0 %{с%}:0 
 %{э%}:0 %{з%}:0 
 !%{т%}:0
 %{й%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{н%}:0

 %'
 %>:0 
 % 
 %- ; 

Sets

Vow = a e i o u ı    ! a' o' u' 
      A E İ O U I ;  ! A' O' U'

FrontVow = e i       ! a' o' u'
           E İ ;     ! A' O' U'

! Vowels that are front if ' follows
FrontableVow = a o u
               A O U ;

BackVow = a ı o u
          A I O U ;

Cns = B V G D J Z Y K P Q L M N R S T W F X H     ! N' G' 
      b v g d j z y k p q l m n r s t w f x h ;   ! n' g'

CnsRight = B V G D J Z Y K P Q L M N R S T W F X H     ! N' G' 
      b v g d j z y k p q l m n r s t w f x h ;   ! n' g'

CnsApostroph = G N
               g n ;

! these consonants are voiceless when they're at the end of a word
VoicelessCns = b v p f d t j s g h k q x 
               B V P F D T J S G H K Q X ; 

VoicedCns = z y r l m n w
            Z Y R L M N W ;

LowSonVoicedCons = m n z
                   M N Z ;

Nasal = m n 
        M N ;

Archiphon = %{G%} %{N%} %{K%} %{D%} %{M%} ;

Empty = %{ь%} %{❗%} %{ꙑ%} ;

Abstract =  %{а%} %{с%} %{э%} %{з%} %{й%} %{л%} %{н%} ;

AbstCons = %{й%} %{с%} %{з%} %{л%} %{н%} ;

AbstVcdCns = %{й%} %{з%} %{л%} %{н%} ;

AbstLowSonVcdCns = %{н%} %{л%} ;

AbstVclsCns = %{с%} ;

Rules

"Deletion of {s} after a consonant"
%{s%}:0 <=> [ :Cns (:%') %>: ]/:0* _  ; 

!"Epenthesis in some stems"
!%{y%}:0 <=> _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

"{n} deletion word final"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ (:0) .#. ;
            _ (:0) % ;  ! also deletion in forms like pıshıq<n><px3sp><ins>, eki<num><coll><subst><px3sp><nom>+da<cnjcoo>

!"Intervocalic voicing of p"
!p:b <=> :Vow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :Vow ;

"Intervocalic voicing of k/q/p"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow [ :0 | :%' ]* _ [ %>: :Vow ]/[ :%' | [ :0 - %>: ] ]* ;
          ! :Vow (:0) _ %{ъ%}: %>: :0* :Vow ;
          except
            ! %{❗%}:0 _ ;
            _ %{❗%}:0 ;
          where Cx in ( k q p ) ! к қ )
                Cy in ( g g b ) ! г ғ )
                matched;

"Forward voicing assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> [ :VoicelessCns - Archiphon: ]/[ %>: | %  | %{ъ%}: | [ :0 - Abstract: ] ]* _ ;
          [ AbstVclsCns: ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | :%- ]* _ ;
          where Cx in ( %{M%}  %{D%}  %{N%} )
                Cy in (   p      t      t   )
                matched;


"{A} vowel harmony"
%{A%}:e <=> [ [ :FrontVow | [ [ :a | :o | :u ] :%' ] ] [ :Cns* :CnsRight ]/:%' ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ꙑ%}: | Abstract: ] ] | %{ъ%}: ]* _ ;
            [ %{ь%}: :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{ь%}: ] _ ;
            [ k:k :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;
            %{э%}: [ AbstCons: | :Cns | [ :0 - Abstract: ] | :%- ]* _ ;

"{I} vowel harmony"
%{I%}:i <=> [ [ :FrontVow | [ [ :a | :o | :u ] :%' ] ] [ :Cns* :CnsRight ]/:%' ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ꙑ%}: | Abstract: ] ] | %{ъ%}: ]* _ ;
            [ %{ь%}: :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{ь%}: ] _ ;
            [ k:k :Cns* ]/:0 _ ;
            %{э%}: [ AbstCons: | :Cns | [ :0 - Abstract: ] | :%- ]* _ ;
        except
            [ %{n%}: %{N%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ .#. ; ! px3 + accusative
            :Vow/:0 _ ;

!"' is impossible after k"
!%{'%}:0 <=> :k (:0)  _ ; 

"Insert ' after g in the context of back vowels"
%{ъ%}:%' <=> [ q:g | g:g | %{G%}:g ] _ :BackVow/[ :0 ]* ;
         except
             _ [ :FrontableVow :%' ]/[ :0 - %{ъ%}: ]* ;
            [ %{ь%}: :Cns* ]/[ :0 - %{ь%}: ] _ ;

!"q to g intervocalically across morpheme boundary"
!q:g <=> _ [ %>: :Vow ]/[ :0 - %>: ] ;

"{G} to q after a voiceless sound followed by back vowels"
!%{G%}:q <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* :VoicelessCns ]/:0 _ ;
! maybe better?
%{G%}:q <=> :VoicelessCns/:0* _ :BackVow/[ :0 | %{ъ%}: ]* ;
        except
            _ [ :FrontableVow :%' ]/:0* ;
            %{n%}:/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ ;

"{G} to k after a voiceless sound followed by front vowels"
!%{G%}:k <=> [ [ :FrontVow | [ :FrontableVow :%' ] ] :Cns* :VoicelessCns ]/:0 _ ;
! maybe better?
%{G%}:k <=>  :VoicelessCns/:0* _ [ :FrontVow | [ :FrontableVow :%' ] ]/:0* ;
        except
             %{n%}:/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ ;

!"{G} to g after voiced cons or vowel"
!%{G%}:g <=> [ :VoicedCns | :Vow | [ :n :%' ] ]/:0 _ ;

"{E} to y after vowels"
%{E%}:y <=> [ :Vow ]/:0 _ ;

"{E} vowel harmony"
%{E%}:e <=> [ [ :FrontVow | [ [ :a | :o | :u ] :%' ] ] :Cns* :CnsRight ]/[ %>: | % | :0 ] _ ;

"{N} to d after voiced consonant"
%{N%}:d <=> [ :VoicedCns | [ :CnsApostroph :%' ] ]/[ :0 - Abstract: ]* _ ;
            [ AbstVcdCns: ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | :%- ] _ ;
        except
            :Nasal ( :%' ) :0* _ :Vow* :Nasal ; ! Nasal harmony
            %{n%}:/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ ; ! px+gen form
            [ :VoicelessCns - Archiphon: ]/[ %>: | %  | %{ъ%}: | :0 ]* _ ;  ! Intervocalic-voicing

!"{N} to t after voiceless consonant"
!%{N%}:t <=> [ :VoicelessCns ]/:0 _ ;

"{M} to b after voiced low-sonority consonat"
%{M%}:b <=> [ :LowSonVoicedCons | [ :n :%' ] ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %  ] _ ;
            [ AbstLowSonVcdCns: ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | :%- ] _ ;
        except
            _ :Nasal/:0 ;
            [ :Nasal ( :%' ) :0* ]/[ :0 | %  ] _ [ :Vow* :Nasal ]/[ :0 | %  ] ;  ! Nasal harmony (FMT: CHECK: ignore spaces!)

"{K} to k after a front vowel"
%{K%}:k <=> :FrontVow/:0 _ ;

"Passives for verbs ending in l"
%{l%}:n <=> :l [ :Vow | :%' ]*/[ :0 ] _ ;

"Delete {I} after another vowel"
%{I%}:0 <=> :Vow/:0 _ ;

"Delete dative {G} after {n}"
%{G%}:0 <=> %{n%}:/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ ;
            [ %{I%}: :n :%' ]/:0* _ ;
            [ %{I%}: :m ]/:0* _ ;

"Delete genitive and accusative {N} after {n}"
%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}:/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ ;
        except
            [ :VoicelessCns - Archiphon: ]/[ %>: | %  | %{ъ%}: | [ :0 - Abstract: ] ]* _ ;
            [ AbstVclsCns: ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | :%- ]* _ ;


"Delete accusative {I} after {n}"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ %{n%}:n %{N%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ .#. ;

"Delete ablative {D} after {n}"
%{D%}:0 <=> %{n%}:/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ %{A%}: :n ;
        except
            [ :VoicelessCns - Archiphon: ]/[ %>: | %  | %{ъ%}: | [ :0 - Abstract: ] ]* _ ;
            [ AbstVclsCns: ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | :%- ]* _ ;

"{D} nasal harmony"
%{D%}:n <=> :Nasal ( :%' ) [ :0 - Abstract: ]* _ :Vow* :Nasal ;
            %{н%}: ( :%' | :%- ) [ :0 - Abstract: ]* _ :Vow* :Nasal ;
        except
            %{n%}:/[ :0 - %{n%}: ]* _ ;

"Back-vowel epenthesis"
%{y%}:ı <=> [ :BackVow [ :Cns* :Cns ]/:%' ]/:0 _ [ :Cns :Cns ]/[ :%' | :0 ] ;
            [ :BackVow [ :Cns* :Cns ]/:%' ]/:0 _ [ :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :%' | :0 ] .#. ;
        except
            _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/[ :%' | :0 ] ;

"Front-vowel epenthesis"
%{y%}:i <=> [ [ :FrontVow | [ :FrontableVow :%' ] ] [ :Cns* :Cns ]/:%' ]/:0 _ [ :Cns :Cns ]/[ :%' | :0 ] ;
            [ [ :FrontVow | [ :FrontableVow :%' ] ] [ :Cns* :Cns ]/:%' ]/:0 _ [ :Cns :Cns* ]/[ :%' | :0 ] .#. ;
        except
            _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/[ :%' | :0 ] ;
